Hawaii statutes.
§24-2 Allowance for non-Oahu legislator
during session. A member of the legislature whose legal residence is on an
island other than Oahu shall receive an additional allowance to cover all
personal expenses such as board, lodging, and incidental expenses but not
travel expenses. The allowance under this section shall be set at a single
rate that will:

(1) Not exceed the greater of the maximum allowance
for such expenses payable to any public officer or employee of the federal
government or the State;

(2) Be reasonably calculated to cover the expenses
specified in this section; and

(3) Be determined jointly by the president of the
senate and the speaker of the house of representatives for the legislature as a
whole.

The allowance shall be paid to each member at the
rate prescribed for each day, from the first to the last day of each session,
including Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of recess pursuant to the
mandatory recess required by article III, section 10, of the Constitution or a
concurrent resolution, except for days of recess when a session of the
legislature is recessed for more than three days pursuant to a concurrent
resolution and for days of unexcused absence of the member from a meeting of
the respective house. [L 1969, c 5, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 2, §2; am L 1983, c
80, §1; am L 2005, c 222, §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next